Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-816.01
Hearing officer; appointment; when.

The presiding officer of the commission may, when he or she deems it necessary to expedite the determination of cases filed with the commission, appoint a hearing officer to hear evidence and make recommended findings and orders in any case or to make recommended determinations after a representation election has been ordered and during the course of such election. Any person appointed as a hearing officer shall be an attorney admitted to practice in Nebraska and shall be knowledgeable in the rules of civil procedure and evidence applicable to the district courts.

Laws 1979, LB 444, § 6;

Laws 2007, LB472, § 6.